Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB294.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1289YC (6) 91 dg/jh H.F. _____ DIVISION I 1 MATERIALS RELATED TO ELECTIONS 2 Section 1. Section 68A.405, Code 2025, is amended by adding 3 the following new subsection: 4 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. a. Published material generated through 5 the use of artificial intelligence and designed to expressly 6 advocate the nomination, election, or defeat of a candidate 7 for public office or the passage or defeat of a ballot issue 8 must contain a disclosure on the published material that the 9 published material was generated using artificial intelligence. 10 The disclosure must include the words âthis material was 11 generated using artificial intelligenceâ. 12 b. For purposes of this subsection, âartificial 13 intelligenceâ means a machine-based system that can, for a 14 given set of human-defined objectives, make predictions, 15 recommendations, or decisions influencing real or virtual 16 environments. 17 c. The board shall adopt rules for the implementation of 18 this subsection. 19 d. A disclosure made in compliance with this subsection 20 does not preclude a private right of action arising out of the 21 publication of published material generated through the use of 22 artificial intelligence. 23 DIVISION II 24 PROTECTIONS IN INTERACTIONS WITH ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE 25 SYSTEMS 26 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 554I.1 Definitions. 27 As used in this chapter: 28 1. a. âAlgorithmic discriminationâ means any use of an 29 artificial intelligence system that results in unfavorable 30 treatment due to an individual or group of individualsâ actual 31 or perceived age, race, creed, color, sex, sexual orientation, 32 national origin, religion, or disability. 33 b. âAlgorithmic discriminationâ does not include the offer, 34 license, or use of an artificial intelligence system for the 35 -1- LSB 1289YC (6) 91 dg/jh 1/ 21 H.F. _____ sole purpose of performing any of the following: 1 (1) Testing to identify, mitigate, or prevent 2 discrimination or otherwise ensure compliance with state or 3 federal law. 4 (2) Expanding an applicant, customer, or participant pool 5 to increase diversity or redress historic discrimination. 6 (3) Any act or omission by or on behalf of a private club 7 or other establishment not in fact open to the public, as 8 established in the federal Civil Rights Act of 1964, Pub. L. 9 No. 88-352, as amended. 10 2. âArtificial intelligence systemâ means any machine-based 11 system that, for any explicit or implicit objective, infers 12 from the inputs the system receives to generate outputs, 13 including content, decisions, predictions, or recommendations, 14 that can influence physical or virtual environments. 15 3. âConsequential decisionâ means any decision that has a 16 material legal or similarly significant effect on the provision 17 or denial of any of the following to an individual: 18 a. A pardon, parole, probation, or release. 19 b. Enrollment in education or an educational opportunity. 20 c. Employment. 21 d. A financial or lending service. 22 e. An essential government service. 23 f. A health care service, as health care is defined in 24 section 144B.1. 25 g. Insurance. 26 h. A legal service. 27 4. âDeployerâ means a person doing business in this state 28 that uses a high-risk artificial intelligence system. 29 5. âDeveloperâ means a person doing business in this state 30 that develops or intentionally and substantially modifies a 31 high-risk artificial intelligence system. 32 6. a. âHigh-risk artificial intelligence systemâ means any 33 artificial intelligence system that makes, or is a factor that 34 would likely alter the outcome of, a consequential decision. 35 -2- LSB 1289YC (6) 91 dg/jh 2/ 21 H.F. _____ b. âHigh-risk artificial intelligence systemâ does not 1 include any of the following: 2 (1) An artificial intelligence system that is only intended 3 to do any of the following: 4 (a) Perform a narrow procedural task. 5 (b) Improve the result of a previously completed human 6 activity. 7 (c) Perform a preparatory task relevant to a consequential 8 decision. 9 (d) Detect any decision-making pattern or any deviation 10 from a preexisting decision-making pattern. 11 (2) Antifraud technology. 12 (3) Antimalware technology. 13 (4) Antivirus technology. 14 (5) Calculators. 15 (6) Cybersecurity technology. 16 (7) Databases. 17 (8) Data storage technology. 18 (9) Firewalls. 19 (10) Internet domain registration technology. 20 (11) Internet website loading technology. 21 (12) Networking. 22 (13) Search engine or similar technology. 23 (14) Spam and robocall filtering technology. 24 (15) Spellchecking. 25 (16) Spreadsheets. 26 (17) Web caching technology. 27 (18) Web hosting technology. 28 (19) Any technology that communicates in natural language 29 for the purpose of providing users with information, making 30 referrals or recommendations, answering questions, or 31 generating other content, and that is subject to an accepted 32 use policy that prohibits generating content that is unlawful. 33 7. âIntentional and substantial modificationâ or 34 âintentionally and substantially modifiesâ means a deliberate 35 -3- LSB 1289YC (6) 91 dg/jh 3/ 21 H.F. _____ change made to an artificial intelligence system that 1 materially increases the risk of algorithmic discrimination. 2 8. âTrade secretâ means the same as defined in section 3 550.2. 4 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 554I.2 Algorithmic discrimination 5 prohibited. 6 1. a. A developer shall use reasonable care to protect 7 individuals from any known or reasonably foreseeable risks 8 of algorithmic discrimination arising from the intended 9 and contracted uses of the developerâs high-risk artificial 10 intelligence system. 11 b. There is a rebuttable presumption that a developer used 12 reasonable care as required under this section if the developer 13 complied with subsections 2 through 8 and any additional 14 requirements established in rules adopted by the attorney 15 general pursuant to section 554I.7. 16 2. A developer shall make all of the following available to 17 a deployer or other developer that uses or intends to use the 18 developerâs high-risk artificial intelligence system: 19 a. A general statement describing the reasonably foreseeable 20 uses and known harmful or inappropriate uses of the high-risk 21 artificial intelligence system. 22 b. Documentation for all of the following: 23 (1) Summaries of the types of data used to train the 24 high-risk artificial intelligence system. 25 (2) The known or reasonably foreseeable limitations of 26 the high-risk artificial intelligence system including but 27 not limited to the known or reasonably foreseeable risks of 28 algorithmic discrimination arising from the intended use of the 29 high-risk artificial intelligence system. 30 (3) The purpose and intended uses of the high-risk 31 artificial intelligence system. 32 (4) The intended outputs of the high-risk artificial 33 intelligence system and how to understand the outputs. 34 (5) The intended benefits of the high-risk artificial 35 -4- LSB 1289YC (6) 91 dg/jh 4/ 21 H.F. _____ intelligence system. 1 (6) How the high-risk artificial intelligence system 2 was evaluated for performance and mitigation of algorithmic 3 discrimination before the high-risk artificial intelligence 4 system was sold, leased, licensed, given, or otherwise made 5 available to the deployer or other developer. 6 (7) The actions or processes the deployer implemented to 7 ensure the quality and consistency of training datasets, the 8 measures used to examine the suitability of data sources, the 9 measures used to evaluate possible biases in the training 10 datasets and data sources, and the measures used to mitigate 11 possible biases in training datasets and data sources. 12 (8) The measures the developer took to mitigate any known 13 or reasonably foreseeable risks of algorithmic discrimination 14 that may arise from using the high-risk artificial intelligence 15 system. 16 (9) How the high-risk artificial intelligence system 17 should be used, should not be used, and should be monitored 18 when the high-risk artificial intelligence system is used to 19 make, or is a factor that would likely alter the outcome of, a 20 consequential decision. 21 (10) Instructions that are reasonably necessary to assist 22 a deployer in monitoring the performance of the high-risk 23 artificial intelligence system for any risk of algorithmic 24 discrimination. 25 3. a. A developer that offers, sells, leases, licenses, 26 gives, or otherwise makes a high-risk artificial intelligence 27 system available to a deployer shall provide documentation 28 and information to the deployer necessary for the deployer to 29 complete an impact assessment under section 554I.3. Materials 30 and data include but are not limited to model cards, dataset 31 cards, and other impact assessments. 32 b. This subsection shall not apply if the deployer is 33 affiliated with the developer that is providing the high-risk 34 artificial intelligence system. 35 -5- LSB 1289YC (6) 91 dg/jh 5/ 21 H.F. _____ 4. A developer shall make a statement available in a manner 1 that is clear and readily available on the developerâs internet 2 site or in a public use case inventory that includes a summary 3 of all of the following: 4 a. The types of high-risk artificial intelligence systems 5 the developer has developed or intentionally and substantially 6 modified and is currently making generally available to 7 deployers. 8 b. How the developer manages known or reasonably foreseeable 9 risks of algorithmic discrimination arising from development 10 or intentional and substantial modification of the types 11 of high-risk artificial intelligence systems described in 12 paragraph âaâ . 13 5. Each developer shall update the statement described 14 in subsection 4 as necessary to ensure that the statement 15 remains accurate, but no later than ninety days after the 16 developer develops or intentionally and substantially modifies 17 a high-risk artificial intelligence system. 18 6. a. A developer shall disclose to the attorney general 19 and to all known deployers or other developers of the high-risk 20 artificial intelligence system any known or foreseeable risks 21 of algorithmic discrimination arising from the intended uses of 22 the high-risk artificial intelligence system. 23 b. A disclosure under paragraph âaâ shall be given to the 24 attorney general no later than ninety days after the earliest 25 of any of the following occurs: 26 (1) The developer discovers through the developerâs 27 ongoing testing and analysis that the developerâs high-risk 28 artificial intelligence system has been used and has caused or 29 is reasonably likely to have caused algorithmic discrimination. 30 (2) The developer receives from a deployer a credible report 31 that the high-risk artificial intelligence system has been used 32 and has caused algorithmic discrimination. 33 7. Subsections 2 through 6 do not require a developer to 34 disclose a trade secret, information protected under state or 35 -6- LSB 1289YC (6) 91 dg/jh 6/ 21 H.F. _____ federal law, or other confidential or proprietary information. 1 8. a. The attorney general may require that a developer 2 disclose to the attorney general any statement or documentation 3 described in subsection 2 if the statement or documentation is 4 relevant to an investigation conducted by the attorney general 5 regarding a violation of this chapter. 6 b. To the extent that a statement or documentation requested 7 by the attorney general pursuant to paragraph âaâ includes 8 proprietary information or a trade secret, the statement 9 or documentation is exempt from disclosure. The developer 10 may designate the statement or documentation as including 11 proprietary information or a trade secret. 12 c. To the extent that a statement or documentation 13 requested by the attorney general pursuant to paragraph âaâ 14 includes information subject to attorney-client privilege or 15 work-product protection, the disclosure does not constitute a 16 waiver of the privilege or protection. 17 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 554I.3 Impact assessments. 18 1. A deployer shall use reasonable care to protect 19 individuals from any known or reasonably foreseeable risks of 20 algorithmic discrimination. In any enforcement action brought 21 by the attorney general, there is a rebuttable presumption that 22 a deployer used reasonable care as required under this section 23 if the deployer complied with subsections 2 through 7 and any 24 additional requirements established in rules adopted by the 25 attorney general pursuant to section 554I.7. 26 2. a. A deployer shall implement a risk management 27 policy and program to govern the deployerâs use of high-risk 28 artificial intelligence systems. 29 b. The risk management policy and program shall specify 30 and incorporate the principles, processes, and personnel that 31 the deployer uses to identify, document, and mitigate known or 32 reasonably foreseeable risks of algorithmic discrimination. 33 c. The risk management program shall be an iterative process 34 that is planned, implemented, and regularly and systematically 35 -7- LSB 1289YC (6) 91 dg/jh 7/ 21 H.F. _____ reviewed and updated for the duration of the deployerâs use of 1 high-risk artificial intelligence systems. 2 d. Each risk management policy and program shall consider 3 all of the following: 4 (1) The guidance and standards established by all of the 5 following: 6 (a) Standards established in the most recent version of the 7 artificial intelligence risk management framework published 8 by the national institute of standards and technology of the 9 United States department of commerce. 10 (b) Standard ISO/IEC 42001 of the international 11 organization for standardization. 12 (c) A nationally or internationally recognized risk 13 management framework for artificial intelligence systems. 14 (d) Standards designated by the attorney general. 15 (2) The size and complexity of the deployer. 16 (3) The nature and scope of the high-risk artificial 17 intelligence system used by the deployer, including but not 18 limited to the intended uses of the high-risk artificial 19 intelligence system. 20 (4) The sensitivity and volume of data processed in 21 connection with the high-risk artificial intelligence systems 22 used by the deployer. 23 3. A risk management policy and program implemented 24 pursuant to this section may cover more than one high-risk 25 artificial intelligence system. 26 4. a. A deployer, or a third party contracted by the 27 deployer to use a high-risk artificial intelligence system, 28 shall complete an impact assessment for the high-risk 29 artificial intelligence system. 30 b. The impact assessment shall be completed no later than 31 ninety days after a high-risk artificial intelligence system 32 or an intentional and substantial modification of a high-risk 33 artificial intelligence system is available for use. 34 c. Each impact assessment shall, at a minimum, include all 35 -8- LSB 1289YC (6) 91 dg/jh 8/ 21 H.F. _____ of the following to the extent reasonably known by or available 1 to the deployer: 2 (1) A statement disclosing all of the following: 3 (a) The purpose for using the high-risk artificial 4 intelligence system. 5 (b) The context for using the high-risk artificial 6 intelligence system. 7 (c) The benefits afforded by using the high-risk artificial 8 intelligence system. 9 (2) An analysis of whether the use of the high-risk 10 artificial intelligence system poses any known or foreseeable 11 risk of algorithmic discrimination and, if so, the nature of 12 the algorithmic discrimination and the steps that have been 13 taken to mitigate the risks. 14 (3) A description of the categories of data the high-risk 15 artificial intelligence system processes as inputs and the 16 outputs the high-risk artificial intelligence system produces. 17 (4) Any metrics used to evaluate the performance and known 18 limitations of the high-risk artificial intelligence system. 19 (5) A description of any transparency measures taken 20 concerning the high-risk artificial intelligence system, such 21 as measures taken to disclose to individuals that the high-risk 22 artificial intelligence system is in use. 23 (6) A description of the post-use monitoring and user 24 safeguards provided concerning the high-risk artificial 25 intelligence system, such as the oversight process established 26 by the deployer to address issues arising from using the 27 high-risk artificial intelligence system. 28 (7) If the impact statement is being made subsequent to 29 an intentional and substantial modification to a high-risk 30 artificial intelligence system, a statement disclosing the 31 extent to which the high-risk artificial intelligence system 32 was used in a manner that was consistent with or varied from 33 the developerâs intended uses of the high-risk artificial 34 intelligence system. 35 -9- LSB 1289YC (6) 91 dg/jh 9/ 21 H.F. _____ d. A single impact statement may address a comparable set of 1 high-risk artificial intelligence systems used by a deployer. 2 5. An impact assessment completed for the purpose of 3 complying with another applicable law or regulation shall 4 satisfy the requirements of this section if the impact 5 assessment is reasonably similar in scope and effect to an 6 impact assessment that would otherwise be completed pursuant to 7 this section. 8 6. A deployer shall maintain the most recently completed 9 impact assessment for a high-risk artificial intelligence 10 system as required under this section and relevant records 11 supporting the impact assessment for a period of at least three 12 years following the final use of the high-risk artificial 13 intelligence system. 14 7. A deployer shall review, at least annually, the 15 deployment of each high-risk artificial intelligence system 16 used by the deployer to ensure that the high-risk artificial 17 intelligence system is not causing algorithmic discrimination. 18 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 554I.4 Disclosures of artificial 19 intelligence system. 20 1. A deployer shall disclose to each individual that 21 interacts with the artificial intelligence system that the 22 individual is interacting with an artificial intelligence 23 system. Developers who make a high-risk artificial 24 intelligence system available in this state shall cooperate 25 with deployers to allow deployers to fulfill the requirements 26 of this subsection. 27 2. A disclosure under subsection 1 is not required in 28 circumstances in which it would be obvious to a reasonable 29 individual that the individual is interacting with an 30 artificial intelligence system. 31 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 554I.5 Exclusions. 32 1. This chapter shall not be construed to restrict a 33 developerâs, deployerâs, or other personâs ability to do any 34 of the following: 35 -10- LSB 1289YC (6) 91 dg/jh 10/ 21 H.F. _____ a. Comply with federal, state, or municipal law. 1 b. Comply with a civil, criminal, or regulatory inquiry, 2 investigation, subpoena, or summons by a federal, state, 3 municipal, or other governmental authority. 4 c. Cooperate with a law enforcement agency concerning 5 conduct or activity that a developer, deployer, or other person 6 reasonably and in good faith believes may violate federal, 7 state, or municipal law. 8 d. Investigate, establish, exercise, prepare for, or defend 9 legal claims. 10 e. Take immediate steps to protect an interest that is 11 essential for the life or physical safety of an individual. 12 f. Engage in public or peer-reviewed scientific or 13 statistical research in the public interest that adheres to 14 all other applicable ethics and privacy laws and is conducted 15 in accordance with 45 C.F.R. pt. 46, as amended, or other 16 relevant requirements established by the federal food and drug 17 administration. 18 g. Conduct research, testing, and development activities 19 regarding an artificial intelligence system, other than testing 20 conducted under real-world conditions, before the artificial 21 intelligence system is placed on the market, used, or otherwise 22 put into service. 23 h. Effectuate a product recall. 24 i. Identify and repair technical errors that impair existing 25 or intended functionality in a computer system or an artificial 26 intelligence system. 27 j. Assist another developer, deployer, or person with any of 28 the requirements of this chapter. 29 2. This chapter does not apply to a developer, deployer, 30 or other person if the circumstances in which the high-risk 31 artificial intelligence system was developed, used, or 32 intentionally and substantially modified are described by any 33 of the following: 34 a. The high-risk artificial intelligence system has been 35 -11- LSB 1289YC (6) 91 dg/jh 11/ 21 H.F. _____ approved, authorized, certified, cleared, developed, or granted 1 by a federal agency and the deployer, developer, or other 2 person is described by any of the following: 3 (1) The person is acting under the authority of the 4 federal agency that approved, authorized, certified, cleared, 5 developed, or granted the high-risk artificial intelligence 6 system. 7 (2) The person is in compliance with standards established 8 by a federal agency for use of high-risk artificial 9 intelligence systems if the requirements imposed by those 10 standards are substantially similar or more restrictive than 11 the requirements of this chapter. 12 b. The developer, deployer, or other person is conducting 13 research to support an application for approval or 14 certification from a federal agency. 15 c. The developer, deployer, or other person is performing 16 work under or in connection with a contract with the United 17 States department of commerce, the United States department of 18 defense, or the national aeronautics and space administration, 19 unless the developer, deployer, or other person is performing 20 work on a high-risk artificial intelligence system that is used 21 to make, or is a factor that would likely alter the outcome of, 22 a decision concerning employment or housing. 23 d. The developer, deployer, or other person is a covered 24 entity within the meaning of the Health Insurance Portability 25 and Accountability Act of 1996, Pub. L. No. 104-191, as 26 amended, and is providing health care recommendations that 27 are generated by an artificial intelligence system, require 28 a health care provider to take action to implement the 29 recommendations, and are not likely to alter the outcome of a 30 consequential decision. 31 3. This chapter does not apply to any artificial 32 intelligence system that is acquired by or for the federal 33 government, a federal agency, or federal department unless 34 the artificial intelligence system is a high-risk artificial 35 -12- LSB 1289YC (6) 91 dg/jh 12/ 21 H.F. _____ intelligence system used to make, or is a factor that would 1 likely alter the outcome of, a decision concerning employment 2 or housing. 3 4. A developer, deployer, or other person shall have the 4 burden to prove an action qualifies for an exclusion under this 5 section. 6 Sec. 7. NEW SECTION . 554I.6 Enforcement. 7 1. The attorney general shall have exclusive authority to 8 enforce this chapter. 9 2. Prior to initiating any action for a violation of this 10 chapter, the attorney general shall issue a notice of violation 11 to the developer, deployer, or other person who allegedly 12 violated the chapter. The notice shall contain all of the 13 following: 14 a. A specific description of the alleged violation. 15 b. The actions the developer, deployer, or other person must 16 take to cure the violation. 17 3. The attorney general may bring an action for the alleged 18 violation if the alleged violation is not cured within ninety 19 days of the date the developer, deployer, or other person 20 received the notice of violation. 21 4. A violation of the requirements established in this 22 chapter is an unlawful practice under section 714.16. 23 5. In any action commenced by the attorney general to 24 enforce this chapter, it is an affirmative defense that the 25 developer, deployer, or other person is described by all of the 26 following: 27 a. The developer, deployer, or other person discovered and 28 cured a violation of this chapter as a result of any of the 29 following: 30 (1) Feedback that the developer, deployer, or other 31 person encourages deployers or other users to provide to the 32 developer, deployer, or other person. 33 (2) Adversarial testing or red teaming, as those terms are 34 defined or used by the national institute of standards and 35 -13- LSB 1289YC (6) 91 dg/jh 13/ 21 H.F. _____ technology. 1 (3) An internal review process. 2 b. The developer, deployer, or other person is otherwise in 3 compliance with any of the following: 4 (1) The latest version of the artificial intelligence risk 5 management framework as published by the national institute 6 of standards and technology and standard ISO/IEC 42001 of the 7 international organization for standardization. 8 (2) A nationally or internationally recognized risk 9 management framework for artificial intelligence systems, if 10 the requirements imposed by those standards are substantially 11 similar or more restrictive than the requirements of this 12 chapter. 13 (3) A risk management framework for artificial intelligence 14 systems that the attorney general designated. 15 6. A developer, deployer, or other person bears the burden 16 of demonstrating to the attorney general that the requirements 17 of subsection 5 have been satisfied. 18 7. a. Prior to initiating any action under this chapter, 19 the attorney general shall consult with the department of 20 health and human services to determine whether any complaint 21 has been filed that is founded on the same act or omission that 22 constitutes a violation of this chapter. 23 b. The attorney general shall not initiate any action to 24 enforce the provisions of this chapter if a complaint has been 25 filed with the department of health and human services relating 26 to the act or omission that constitutes a violation of this 27 chapter unless the complaint has been fully adjudicated or 28 resolved. 29 8. This chapter shall not preempt or otherwise affect any 30 right, claim, remedy, presumption, or defense available at 31 law or in equity. Any rebuttable presumption or affirmative 32 defense established under this chapter shall apply only to an 33 enforcement action brought by the attorney general pursuant to 34 this chapter and shall not apply to any right, claim, remedy, 35 -14- LSB 1289YC (6) 91 dg/jh 14/ 21 H.F. _____ presumption, or defense available at law or in equity. 1 9. The attorney general shall post on its internet site 2 how to properly file a complaint for a violation under this 3 chapter. 4 10. This section does not provide a basis for a private 5 right of action for violations of this chapter or any other 6 law. 7 Sec. 8. NEW SECTION . 554I.7 Attorney general rulemaking 8 authority. 9 The attorney general shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 10 17A to implement this chapter. 11 Sec. 9. Section 714.16, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 12 by adding the following new paragraph: 13 NEW PARAGRAPH . r. It is an unlawful practice for a person 14 to violate any of the provisions of chapter 554I. 15